California, session 20252026, AB353.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 307.6 of the Public Utilities Code is amended to read:307.6. (a) The commission shall appoint a chief internal auditor, who shall hold office at the pleasure of the commission.(b) The chief internal auditor shall be responsible for the oversight of the internal audit unit and shall plan, initiate, and perform audits of key financial, management, operational, and information technology functions within the commission to improve accountability and transparency to executive and state management.(c) The chief internal auditor shall report his or her their findings and recommendations directly to an audit subcommittee of the commission.(d) The chief internal auditor shall comply with Part 3.5 (commencing with Section 13885) of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.(e) This section shall become inoperative on the date the internal audit unit of the commission is transferred to the Independent Office of Audits and Investigations pursuant to Section 2 of this act, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 307.6 is added to the Public Utilities Code, to read:307.6. (a) On or before January 1, 2028, the internal audit unit of the commission and its staff shall be transferred to the Independent Office of Audits and Investigations, which is hereby established within the commission to ensure all of the following:(1) The commission is administering funds under its control, including ratepayer funds, efficiently, effectively, economically, and in compliance with applicable state and federal requirements.(2) The commission’s programs are functioning consistent with applicable accounting standards and practices and are administered effectively, efficiently, and economically.(3) The commission is accomplishing mandated requirements, developing an annual audit plan, administering an effective enterprise risk management program, and making efficient, effective, and financially responsible decisions.(4) The president of the commission, the Legislature, and the Governor are fully informed concerning fraud, improper activities, and other serious abuses or deficiencies relating to the expenditure of ratepayer funds or the administration of commission programs and operations.(5) The commission is monitoring compliance for reports prepared by the commission that are required to be submitted to the Governor and Legislature.(b) The office shall be responsible for the oversight of the internal audit unit and shall plan, initiate, and perform audits of key financial, management, operational, and information technology functions within the commission to improve accountability and transparency to executive and state management.(c) The director of the office shall have the title of Inspector General and shall be appointed by the Governor, subject to Senate confirmation. The Inspector General shall serve a six-year term and shall not be removed from office during that term, except for good cause. Any basis for removal of the Inspector General shall be stated in writing, shall be sent to the Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the Assembly at the time of the removal, and shall be deemed to be a public document.(d) The Inspector General is vested with the full authority to exercise all responsibility for maintaining a full-scope, independent, and objective audit and investigation program.(e) The office shall have access to, and authority to examine, all records, files, documents, accounts, reports, correspondence, or other property of the commission, public utilities, and other entities regulated by the commission. An authorized representative of the office may enter any public office or institution in this state, during regular business hours, and access, examine, and reproduce all records, files, documents, accounts, reports, vouchers, correspondence files, and all other records for any audit or investigation. An officer or employee of an agency or entity that has records or property in their possession or under their control, or otherwise has access to records, shall permit access to, and examination and reproduction of, the records or property upon the request of the Inspector General or the Inspector General’s authorized representative.(f) In order to achieve independence and objectivity pursuant to this section, the Inspector General shall do both of the following:(1) Report all audit and confidential investigation findings and recommendations made under the Inspector General’s jurisdiction to the Governor and Legislature on an ongoing and current basis.(2) Report to the Governor and the Legislature at least annually, and upon request, with a summary of the Inspector General’s investigation and audit findings and recommendations. The summary shall be posted on the office’s internet website and shall otherwise be made available to the public upon its release to the Governor, the commission, and the Legislature. The summary shall include, but not be limited to, significant problems discovered by the Inspector General and whether the Inspector General’s recommendations relative to audits and investigations have been implemented by the affected units and programs of the commission or affected external entities.(3) A report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this subdivision shall be in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Title 15.7 (commencing with Section 3150) is added to Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, to read:15.7.Affordable Home Internet3150.This title shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Affordable Home Internet Act of 2025.3152.As used in this title, all of the following definitions apply:(a)“Affordable home internet service” means an internet service plan or subscription that is offered for purchase to eligible households at speeds of at least 50 megabytes per second downstream and 10 megabytes per second upstream at a cost not to exceed fifteen dollars ($15) per month, not including taxes or other charges imposed by a government entity.(b)“California internet service provider” means an internet service provider doing business within California.(c)“California service territory” means any address in California where a California internet service provider offers internet service to residential customers.(d)“Commercial mobile service” means any mobile service that is provided for profit and makes interconnected service available to the public or to such classes of eligible users as to be effectively available to a substantial portion of the public.(e)“Eligible household” means a household within the California internet service provider’s California service territory with at least one resident of the household participating in a qualified public assistance program. (f)(1)“Internet service” means a mass-market retail service by wire or radio provided to residential customers in California that provides the capability to transmit data to, and receive data from, all or substantially all internet endpoints, including, but not limited to, any capabilities that are incidental to and enable the operation of the communications service, but excluding dial-up internet access service and digital subscriber line service, regardless of the technology used.(2)“Internet service” does not include a commercial mobile service or a private mobile service.(g)“Minimum speed requirements” means at least 100 megabits per second downstream and 20 megabits per second upstream and sufficient speed and latency to support distance learning and telehealth services.(h)“Private mobile service” means any mobile service that is not a commercial mobile service or the functional equivalent of a commercial mobile service. The Department of Technology may subsequently modify the definition of “private mobile service” to avoid conflict with Section 332 of Title 47 of the United States Code or regulations adopted pursuant to that section.(i)“Qualified public assistance program” means the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) program under Part A (commencing with Section 401) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.), the CalFresh program established pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the state health care program established pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, also known as the Medi-Cal program, or the federal Supplemental Security Income program established under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act.3154.Every California internet service provider, except those exempt pursuant to Section 3160, shall offer for purchase to eligible households within their California service territory affordable home internet service that meets minimum speed requirements.3156.Every California internet service provider shall make commercially reasonable efforts to promote and advertise the availability of affordable home internet service for eligible households, including, but not limited to, the prominent display of, and enrollment procedures for, that service on its internet website and in any written and commercial promotional materials developed to inform consumers in eligible households.3158.Beginning on January 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, every California internet service provider shall provide a report to the Department of Technology with the following information:(a)A description of the affordable home internet service plan offered.(b)The number of households that purchased the service.3160.The following California internet service providers are exempt from complying with the requirements of Section 3154: (a)A small independent telephone corporation, as defined in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 275.6 of the Public Utilities Code, and its California internet service provider affiliates.(b)A California internet service provider with less than 50,000 subscribers that primarily serves households for which there are no other California internet service providers offering internet service.(c)A joint powers authority formed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.(d)A California internet service provider that participates in the California lifeline program established pursuant to Section 873.5 of the Public Utilities Code.3162.(a)Notwithstanding any other law, the Public Utilities Commission shall have no jurisdiction or regulatory authority to implement, enforce, interpret, or oversee any aspect of this title, including, but not limited to, by doing any of the following:(1)Setting or approving rates or terms for affordable home internet service plans for entities required to comply with this title.(2)Determining California internet service provider compliance with the requirements of this title.(3)Investigating, penalizing, or taking enforcement action against a California internet service provider pursuant to this title.(4)Administering eligibility verification processes.(5)Requiring California internet service providers to submit tariffs, advice letters, or data for approval under this title.(b)Any administrative or oversight responsibilities pursuant to this title shall be carried out exclusively by the Department of Technology.3164.This title shall become inoperative upon the implementation of a federal or state broadband subscription subsidy program for low-income households that meets all of the following criteria:(a)Provides a recurring financial benefit, of fifteen dollars ($15) or more per month, to low-income households to offset the cost of internet service.(b)Applies to home internet service plans offering speeds consistent with the minimum speed requirements.(c)Is supported by sustained public funding.(d)Is utilized by all California internet service providers with more than 100,000 customers.